Utah statutes.
13-28-7.   Penalties -- Administrative and criminal.

(1)  Any person who violates this chapter shall be subject to:

(a)  a cease and desist order; and

(b)  an administrative fine of not less than $100 or more than $5,000 for each separate violation.

(2)  All administrative fines shall be deposited in the Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund created in Section 13-2-8.

(3)  Any person who intentionally violates this part is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and may be fined up to $10,000.  A person intentionally violates this part if the violation occurs after the division, attorney general, or a district or county attorney notifies the person by certified mail that he is in violation of this chapter.

